Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB383.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 8528(b) and 8553(b) and (c)(2)(ii) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 8528. Limitations on damages.* * *(b) Amount recoverable.--Damages arising from the same cause of action or transaction or occurrence or series of causes of action or transactions or occurrences shall not exceed $250,000 in favor of any plaintiff or $1,000,000 in the aggregate[.], except in cases involving permanent dismemberment or death, in which case damages arising from the same cause of action or transaction or occurrence or series of causes of action or 1234567891011121314151617181920 transactions or occurrences shall not exceed $1,000,000 in favor of any plaintiff or $2,000,000 in the aggregate.* * *§ 8553. Limitations on damages.* * *(b) Amounts recoverable.--Damages arising from the same cause of action or transaction or occurrence or series of causes of action or transactions or occurrences shall not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate[.], except in cases involving permanent dismemberment or death, in which case damages arising from the same cause of action or transaction or occurrence or series of causes of action or transactions or occurrences shall not exceed $1,000,000 in the aggregate.(c) Types of losses recognized.--Damages shall be recoverable only for:* * *(2) Pain and suffering in the following instances:* * *(ii) only in cases of permanent loss of a bodily function, permanent disfigurement or permanent dismemberment where the medical and dental expenses referred to in paragraph (3) are in excess of [$1,500] $10,000.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to all causes of action or transactions or occurrences or series of causes of action or transactions or occurrences that occurred on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0383PN0296 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829